test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_uainid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - uáiniđ: #generated from FST
    uáiniđ+V+Inf: uáiniđ
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáinám
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáináh
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáiná
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáineen
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáinivettee
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáiniv
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáinip
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáinivetteđ
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáinih
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oinim
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oinih
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ooinij
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ooinijm
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ooinijd
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ooinijn
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ooinijm
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ooinijd
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: oinii
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: uáináččim
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: uáináččih
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: uáináččij
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: uáináččáim
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: uáináččáid
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: uáináččáin
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: uáináččijm
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: uáináččijd
    uáiniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: uáináččii
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uáineem
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uáineeh
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ooiniš
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: oinižeen
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ooinišvettee
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: oinižává
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: oinižep
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ooinišvetteđ
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: oinižeh
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uáini
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáinus
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáinoon
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáinee
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáinus
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáinup
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uáiniđ
    uáiniđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáinus
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáini
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uáinám
    uáiniđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: uáináá
    uáiniđ+V+PrsPrc: uáinee
    uáiniđ+V+PrfPrc: uáinám
    uáiniđ+V+Actio+Nom: uáinim
    uáiniđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáinimin
    uáiniđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáinimist
    uáiniđ+V+Actio+Ill: uáinimân
    uáiniđ+V+VAbess: uáinihánnáá

     
  Verb - puáldiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    puáldiđ+V+Inf: puáldiđ
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáldám
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáldá
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puáldih
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: poldim
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pooldij
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puáldi
    puáldiđ+V+PrfPrc: puáldám
     
  Verb - čuággiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    čuággiđ+V+Inf: čuággiđ
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuágám
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuággá
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuággih
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čoggim
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čoogij
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čuági
    čuággiđ+V+PrfPrc: čuággám
     
  Verb - uástiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    uástiđ+V+Inf: uástiđ
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uástám
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uástá
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uástih
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ostim
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oostij
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uásti
    uástiđ+V+PrfPrc: uástám
     
